Utah statutes.
76-7-301.5.   Relationship to criminal homicide.

(1)  This part does not apply to the killing or attempted killing of a live unborn child in any manner that is not an abortion.

(2)  The killing or attempted killing of a live unborn child in a manner that is not an abortion shall be punished as provided in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 2, Criminal Homicide.

